District of Columbia statutes.
46-306.09

Procedure to register child support order of another state for modification.

A party or support enforcement agency seeking to modify, or to modify and enforce, a child support order issued in another state shall register that order in the District in the same manner as provided in part A of this subchapter if the order has not been registered. A petition for modification may be filed at the same time as a request for registration, or later. The pleading must specify the grounds for modification.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 609, 42 DCR 6748

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-346.9.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 609 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).